Wisconsin, session 2025, SB127.
do enact as follows:SB127,11Section 1. 292.11 (9) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB127,2,32292.11 (9) (g) 1. In this paragraph, “PFAS” means any perfluoroalkyl or 3polyfluoroalkyl substance.SB127,2,642. All of the following persons are exempt from subs. (3), (4), and (7) (b) and (c) 5with respect to PFAS contamination if the person grants permission to the 6department to remediate the land at the department’s expense:SB127,2,87a. A person that spread biosolids or wastewater residuals contaminated by 8PFAS in compliance with any applicable license or permit.SB127,2,119b. A person that owns land upon which biosolids or wastewater residuals 10contaminated by PFAS were spread in compliance with any applicable license or 11permit.SB127,3,212c. A fire department, public-use airport, as defined in s. 114.002 (18m), or 13municipality that responded to an emergency that required the use of PFAS or that 1conducted training for such an emergency in compliance with applicable federal 2regulations.SB127,3,33d. A solid waste disposal facility that accepted PFAS.SB127,3,64e. A person that owns, leases, manages, or contracts for property on which the 5PFAS contamination did not originate, unless the person also owns, leases, 6manages, or contracts for the property on which the PFAS discharge originated.SB127,3,77